Washington statutes.
RCW 15.09.120

Disposition of moneys collected.

Any moneys collected under this chapter shall be placed in the county current expense fund together with any taxes collected pursuant to the provisions of RCW 15.08.260, as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1969 c 113 s 12.]